Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 83.100 of Title 73 unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
install a commercial grade bidet seat in each facility of the main
building of the Oklahoma State Capitol in an area which has been
determined prior to the effective date of this act as being
compliant with the Americans With Disabilities Act.
Req. No. 12497 Page 1

B. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall not
expend more than Four Thousand Dollars ($4,000.00) per facility as
described by this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-12497 MAH 02/11/25














Req. No. 12497 Page 2